Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-150
Sewerage system; establishment; estimates; duties of engineer; contracts; advertisement for bids.

The city engineer, when ordered to do so by the city council, shall make all surveys, estimates and calculations necessary to be made for the establishment of a sewerage system, and of the cost of labor and materials therefor; Provided, the mayor and council may, when they deem it expedient, employ a special engineer to make or assist in making any estimate or survey herein provided for, and any estimate or survey made by such special engineer shall have the same validity, and serve in all respects as though made by the city engineer. Before the city council shall make any contract for building any such sewers or any part thereof, an estimate of the cost thereof shall be made by the city engineer, or by a special engineer as above, and submitted to the council, and no contract shall be entered into for the building of any such sewers or any part thereof for a price exceeding such estimate. In advertising for bids for any such work or materials, the council shall cause the amount of such estimate to be published therewith. Such advertisement shall be for at least twenty days in some newspaper published in the city.

Laws 1903, c. 22, § 2, p. 255;

R.S.1913, § 5044;

C.S.1922, § 4213;

C.S.1929, § 17-152;

R.S.1943, § 17-150.